District of Columbia statutes.
47-2008

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of §§ 47-2006 and 47-2007.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-145, § 5, 25 DCR 6983
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2008.
1973 Ed., § 47-2605.3.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(zz) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(zz) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(yy) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(zz) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(zz) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 2-145, see Mayor’s Order 86-143, August 25, 1986.